Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,268
Swimming pools; local government; inspection; fees; records; department; classification; plans and specifications; fees; disposition; certificate of competency; existing rules, regulations, licenses, permits, forms of approval, suits, other proceedings; how treated.

(1) The local government which exercises jurisdiction over a swimming pool shall inspect such swimming pool to determine that such swimming pool complies with the minimum sanitary and safety requirements established by the local government.

(2) A local government may establish and collect fees for the inspection of a swimming pool at a rate not more than the actual costs of the inspection.

(3) The owner and operator of any swimming pool shall operate such swimming pool in compliance with minimum sanitary and safety requirements established by the local government which exercises jurisdiction over such swimming pool. The owner or operator of any swimming pool shall retain for three years operation and analytical records to determine the sanitary and safety condition of the swimming pool and shall make such records available to the local government upon request.

(4) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations which classify swimming pools on the basis of criteria deemed appropriate by the department. The department shall charge engineering firms, swimming pool owners, and other appropriate parties fees established by rules and regulations for the review of plans and specifications of a swimming pool, the issuance of a construction permit, and any other services rendered at a rate which defrays no more than the actual cost of the services provided. Fees collected under this subsection for the review of plans and specifications and the issuance of a construction permit shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Engineering Plan Review Cash Fund.

(5) The operator of any swimming pool shall maintain a certificate of competency for swimming pools. The department shall maintain a list of acceptable pool operator competency courses.

(6) All rules and regulations adopted prior to July 18, 2026, under sections 81-15,264 to 81-15,270, as such sections existed prior to such date, shall continue to be effective to the extent not in conflict with the changes made by Laws 2026, LB759, until amended or repealed by the department.

(7) All licenses, permits, or other forms of approval issued prior to July 18, 2026, in accordance with sections 81-15,264 to 81-15,270, as such sections existed prior to such date, shall remain valid as issued for purposes of the changes made by Laws 2026, LB759, unless revoked or otherwise terminated by law.

(8) Any suit, action, or other proceeding, judicial or administrative, which was lawfully commenced prior to July 18, 2026, under sections 81-15,264 to 81-15,270, as such sections existed prior to such date, shall be subject to the provisions of such sections as they existed prior to July 18, 2026.

Laws 1969, c. 760, § 5, p. 2876;

Laws 1973, LB 583, § 12;

Laws 1976, LB 440, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 812, § 2;

Laws 1983, LB 617, § 23;

Laws 1986, LB 1047, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 672;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 83;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 123;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 583;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1217;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 71-4305;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 8;

Laws 2026, LB759, § 29.
July 18, 2026